Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5339.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 16-11-2.3 and 16-11-3 of the General Laws in Chapter 16-11 entitled
"Certification of Teachers [See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]"
are hereby amended to read as follows:
16-11-2.3. Standardized testing — Issuance of certificates.
(a) No person who obtained an initial certificate prior to January 8, 2002 shall be barred
from certification under this chapter solely because of his or her score on any standardized teacher’s
examination; provided, however, that he or she successfully completes an assessment, based on
criteria established by the board of regents for elementary and secondary education, in accordance
with 34 CFR § 200.56.
(b) The board of regents for elementary and secondary education may administer a written
examination to prospective teachers seeking certification.
(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (a) and (b) of this section, until July 1,
2027, the requirement of completion of a standardized teacher's examination as a prerequisite to
obtaining a teaching certificate under this chapter shall be suspended. No applicant for a teaching
certification under this chapter shall be required to take any standardized teacher's examination or
assessment designated by the board of elementary and secondary education or the department of
elementary and secondary education prior to July 1, 2027. Provided, however, this subsection shall
not apply to any testing that is required as part of an accredited post-secondary teacher preparation
program.

16-11-3. Certificates without examination.
The board of regents for elementary and secondary education may, in its discretion, issue
certificates of qualification without examination to persons who may present evidence of
qualification and shall comply with the regulations of the board. Provided, that any teacher who is
certified in two (2) fields or subjects of science, other than general science, shall also be
automatically certified in the field or subject of general science without the need for examination
or other proof of qualifications in the subject of general science.
(b) Until July 1, 2027, the requirement of completion of a standardized teacher's
examination as a prerequisite to obtaining a teaching certificate under this chapter shall be
suspended. No applicant for a teaching certification under this chapter shall be required to take any
standardized teacher's examination or assessment designated by the board of elementary and
secondary education or the department of elementary and secondary education prior to July 1, 2027.
Provided, however, this subsection shall not apply to any testing that is required as part of an
accredited post-secondary teacher preparation program.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001297
========
LC001297 - Page 2 of 3